Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-118
License, defined.

License means an authorization issued by the department to an individual to engage in a profession or to a business to provide services which would otherwise be unlawful in this state in the absence of such authorization.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 18.